Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2953
Existence and powers of board of directors.

(1) A limited cooperative association shall have a board of directors consisting of three or more directors as set forth in the articles of organization or bylaws unless the number of members is less than three. If there are fewer than three members, the number of directors shall not be less than the number of members in the limited cooperative association.

(2) The affairs of the limited cooperative association shall be managed by, or under the direction of, the board of directors. The board of directors may adopt policies and procedures that are not in conflict with the articles of organization, the bylaws, and the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act.

(3) A director does not have agency authority on behalf of the limited cooperative association solely by being a director.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 53;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 14.